Massachusetts, session 194th, H3227.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 6 of Chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting the
following new section:
(x) Allowances afforded to a purchaser in a bundled cellular telephone
transaction, so-called. For the purposes of this subsection, allowances exempt from taxation
shall be the difference between the amount the dealer charges for a particular telephone in a
bundled transaction and the price the dealer would charge for that same telephone in an
unbundled transaction.
of 1